District of Columbia statutes.
1-615.03

Repealed

Complaints of criminal harassment for appearances and testimony before the Council.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1503, 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 26, 1990, D.C. Law 8-169, § 2(a), 37 DCR 4835
Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(b), 45 DCR 5147
1981 Ed., § 1-616.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-345.3.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-615.01.